Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 3. Compulsory Attendance

§ 1121.
Attendance by children of school age required.

A person having the control of a child between the ages of six and 16 years shall cause the child to attend a public school, an approved or recognized independent school, an approved education program, or a home study program for the full number of days for which that school is held, unless the child:

is mentally or physically unable so to attend; or

has completed the tenth grade; or

is excused by the superintendent or a majority of the school directors as provided in this chapter; or

is enrolled in and attending a postsecondary school, as defined in subdivision 176(b)(1) of this title, which is approved or accredited in Vermont or another state.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 46

, § 1, eff. May 5, 1965;

1967, No. 55

;

1981, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 97

, § 2, eff. June 23, 1987;

1989, No. 44

, § 5, eff. June 1, 1990;

1999, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 44

, § 35, eff. May 21, 2009.

§ 1122.
Students over 16.

A person having the control of a child over 16 years of age who allows the child to become enrolled in a public school shall cause the child to attend the school continually for the full number of the school days of the term in which he or she is enrolled, unless the child is mentally or physically unable to continue or is excused in writing by the superintendent or a majority of the school directors. In case of such enrollment, the person and the teacher, child, superintendent, and school directors shall be under the laws and subject to the penalties relating to the attendance of children between the ages of six and 16 years.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 46

, § 2, eff. May 5, 1965;

2011, No. 58

, § 2, eff. May 31, 2011.

§ 1123.
Attendance may be excused.

The superintendent of a public school may excuse, in writing, any student from attending the school for a definite time, but for not more than ten consecutive school days and only for emergencies or for absence from town.

The superintendent of an elementary school held for more than 175 school days in a school year may excuse, in writing, a student of the school from attending more than 175 days.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 56

, § 9, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1124.
Repealed. 2013, No. 56, § 15(1), eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1125.
Truant officers.

A school board shall annually appoint one or more truant officers and record their appointments with the clerk of the school district on or before July 3. State police, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, constables, and police officers shall be truant officers ex officio.

Truant officers shall receive remuneration for time actually spent in performance of their duties and shall be allowed their necessary expenses incurred in connection therewith.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 73.

§ 1125a.
Repealed. 2013, No. 56, § 15(2), eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1126.
Failure to attend; notice.

When a student between the ages of six and 16 years, who is not excused or exempted from school attendance, fails to enter school at the beginning of the academic year or, being enrolled, fails to attend the school, and when a student who is at least 16 years of age becomes enrolled in a public school and fails to attend, the teacher or principal shall notify the truant officer and either the superintendent or the school board, unless the teacher or principal is satisfied that the student is absent on account of illness.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 46

, § 3, eff. May 5, 1965;

1975, No. 48

, § 11, eff. April 15, 1975;

1999, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 121, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1127.
Notice and complaint by truant officer; penalty.

The truant officer, upon receiving the notice provided in section 1126 of this title, shall inquire into the cause of the nonattendance of the child. If he or she finds that the child is absent without cause, the truant officer shall give written notice to the person having the control of the child that the child is absent from school without cause and shall also notify that person to cause the child to attend school regularly thereafter.

When, after receiving notice, a person fails, without legal excuse, to cause a child to attend school as required by this chapter, he or she shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

The truant officer shall enter a complaint to the State’s Attorney of the county and shall provide a statement of the evidence upon which the complaint is based. The State’s Attorney shall prosecute the person. In the prosecution, the complaint, information, or indictment shall be deemed sufficient if it states that the respondent (naming the respondent) having the control of a child of school age (naming the child) neglects to send that child to a public school or an approved or recognized independent school or a home study program as required by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1987, No. 97

, § 6, eff. June 23, 1987;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 122, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1128.
Legal pupil taken to school; nonresident child living in district.

A superintendent may and the truant officer shall stop a child between the ages of six and 16 years or a child 16 years of age or over and enrolled in public school, wherever found during school hours, and shall, unless such child is excused or exempted from school attendance, take the child to the school that she or he should attend.

A child of legal school age who is not exempt from school attendance and who has not finished the elementary school course and is living in a district other than the place of legal residence shall, with the school board’s approval, be admitted immediately to a school in the district where he or she is found. If the child is not admitted to school, then immediate action shall be taken by the truant officer to cause the return of the child to the district of his or her residence.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 46

, § 4, eff. May 5, 1965;

1999, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1129.
Jurisdiction of nonresidents.

The superintendent of a school in which a nonresident pupil is enrolled and a truant officer having jurisdiction of the pupils in such school shall have the same authority and jurisdiction over such nonresident pupil and the person having the control of such pupil as they have over resident pupils and the persons having control of such pupils.

§ 1130.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.